Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 35. Municipal Budget

§ 21-35-1.
Citation of chapter.

This chapter may be cited as the “Municipal Budget Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 1, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-3.
Fiscal year.

Each municipality of the State of Mississippi shall operate on a fiscal year basis, beginning October first and ending September thirtieth of each year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-02; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 2, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-5.
Preparation and publication of annual budget; public hearing.

The governing authorities of each municipality of the State of Mississippi shall, not later than September 15 each year, prepare a complete budget of the municipal revenues, expenses and working cash balances estimated for the next fiscal year, and shall prepare a statement showing the aggregate revenues collected during the current year in said municipality for municipal purposes. Such statement shall show every source of revenue along with the amount derived from each source. Said budget of any municipality of one thousand five hundred (1,500) inhabitants or more, according to the last preceding federal census, with said statement of revenue and expenses, shall be published at least one (1) time during September of said year in a newspaper published in such municipality or, if no newspaper be published in such municipality, in any newspaper published in the county wherein the municipality is located. In municipalities of less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) inhabitants, according to the last preceding federal census, as many as three (3) prepared statements of said budget shall be posted in three (3) public places in said municipalities.

Prior to the adoption of a budget pursuant to this section, the governing authority of each municipality shall hold at least one (1) public hearing to provide the general public with an opportunity to comment on the taxing and spending plan incorporated in the proposed budget. The public hearing shall be held at least one (1) week prior to the adoption of the budget with advance notice and held outside normal working hours. The advance notice shall include an announcement published or posted in the same manner as required for the final adopted budget.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3970; 1942, § 9121-03; Laws, 1926, ch. 217; Laws, 1940, ch. 282; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 549, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 470; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 21-35-7.
Form of budget.

Said budget of expenses and revenue shall be prepared in such form as may be necessary, upon forms to be prescribed by the state auditor, as the head of the state department of audit, or the director thereof, appointed by him, as designated and defined in Title 7, Chapter 7, of the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any office or officers hereafter designated to replace or perform the duties imposed by said chapter, to show all estimates for the different municipal purposes of expenditure and source of revenue, respectively.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3971; 1942, § 9121-04; Laws, 1922, ch. 225; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 4, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-9.
Contents of final budget; approval thereof.

The budget as finally determined, in addition to setting out separately each item for which any appropriation of expenditures is authorized to be expended and the fund out of which the same is to be paid, shall set out the total amount appropriated and authorized to be expended from each fund, the cash balance in the fund at the close of the present preceding fiscal year, the working cash balance necessary for the next fiscal year, the estimated amount, if any, which will accrue to the fund from sources other than taxation for the current fiscal year, and the amount necessary to be raised for each fund by tax levy during the current fiscal year. The governing authorities of the municipality shall then, by resolution, approve and adopt the budget as finally determined, and enter the same at length and in detail in their official minutes.

The board of governing authorities shall not authorize any expenditure of money, and the city clerk shall not issue any warrant for same, except for bonds, notes, debts and interest, after October 1 in each year, unless and until the budget be finally approved, and such approval entered upon their minutes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 9121-07, 9121-18; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, §§ 7, 18; Laws, 1981, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 21-35-11.
Records of municipal funds.

The clerk of the municipality shall open and keep a regular set of records, as prescribed by the State Auditor, as the head of the State Department of Audit, or the director thereof, appointed by him, as designated and defined in Title 7, Chapter 7, of the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any office or officers hereafter designated to replace or perform the duties imposed by said chapter, of each and every fund of the municipality, subject always to inspection within office hours by any citizen desiring to inspect the same. Said records shall contain accounts, under headings, corresponding with the several headings of the budget, so that the expenditures under each head may be at once known, and the purpose for which expended, and said records shall show the source of all monies received and paid into each fund of the municipality. Said records shall be paid for out of the general municipal fund, upon the order of the proper municipal authorities.

For failure to perform any duty herein required, said clerk shall be subject to suit on his bond for any damage which the municipality may sustain by reason of such failure. Such suit, or suits, shall be brought by the city attorney or by any attorney designated and empowered to do so by the proper governing authorities of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3972; 1942, §§ 9121-05, 9121-16; Laws, 1922, ch. 225; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, §§ 5, 16; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-35-13.
Monthly report of clerk.

At the regular meeting in each month, the city clerk shall submit to the governing authorities of the municipality a report showing the expenditures and liabilities incurred against each separate budget appropriation item during the preceding calendar month, and like information for the whole of the fiscal year to the first day of the month in which such report is made, together with the unexpended balance of each appropriation item and the unencumbered balance. He shall also set forth the receipts from property taxes and, in detail, the receipts from other taxes and all other sources of each fund for the same period.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-12; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 12, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-15.
Expenditure of funds.

The governing authorities shall at all times keep within the sums named in their said budget and within the annual revenue, always seeking to lessen expenditures instead of exceeding revenue and budget estimates. There shall not be added to the amount to be appropriated and authorized to be expended for any item, or to the total amount appropriated and authorized to be expended from any fund any amount or percentage whatever because of any anticipated loss of revenue by reason of the nonpayment of taxes levied for the current fiscal year. The amount appropriated and authorized to be expended for any item contained in such budget, except for capital outlay, election expenses, and payment of emergency warrants and interest thereon, must not exceed the amount actually estimated for such item, and the total amount appropriated and authorized to be expended from any fund, except for capital outlay, election expenses and payment of emergency warrants and interest thereon, shall not exceed the total amount actually estimated for all purposes. The total expenditures authorized to be made from any fund shall not exceed the aggregate cash balance, in such fund at the close of the fiscal year immediately preceding, plus the amount of estimated revenues to accrue to such fund, as determined and fixed in the manner provided by this chapter, and the amount which may be raised for such fund by a lawful tax levy during the current fiscal year. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prevent any municipality from making adequate provision at any time for the payment of principal of and interest on its outstanding bonded indebtedness.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 6, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-17.
Budget estimates not to be exceeded; liability therefor; exemption for unfunded employee retirement or pension funds.

Expenditures made, liabilities incurred, or warrants issued in excess of any of the budget detailed appropriations as originally and finally determined, or as thereafter revised by transfer as provided by this chapter, shall not be a liability of the municipality, but the official making or incurring such expenditure or issuing such warrant shall be liable therefor personally and upon his official bond. The governing authorities shall not approve any claim and the city clerk shall not issue any warrant for any expenditure in excess of said detailed budget appropriations as finally adopted, or as revised under the provisions of this chapter, except upon an order of a court of competent jurisdiction or for an emergency, as provided in this chapter. Any one or more of the governing authorities, or clerk, approving any claim or issuing any warrant in excess of any such budget appropriation, except as above provided, shall forfeit to the municipality twice the amount of such claim or warrant, which shall be recovered in an action against such member, or members, of the governing authorities, or clerk, or all of them, and the several sureties on their official bonds, and it shall be the duty of the governing authorities of such municipality, or the State Auditor, as the head of the State Department of Audit, or the director thereof, appointed by him, or any taxpayer of such municipality, to bring an action therefor through the city attorney, or any attorney designated and empowered so to do by a court of competent jurisdiction. Provided, however, that the term “budgeted expenditures” for purposes of personal liability of members of the local governing authorities under this section shall not include any unfunded liability for municipal employee retirement or pension funds. Nothing in this section shall diminish any responsibility of the members of the local governing authorities to fund any employee retirement or pension plans, or any liability as a result of any failure to fund such plans as otherwise required by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-08; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 8, eff from and after August 31, 1950; Laws, 2018, ch. 434, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 21-35-19.
Emergency expenditures.

Upon the happening of any emergency caused by fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, riot or insurrection, or caused by any inherent defect due to defective construction, or when the immediate preservation of order or of public health is necessary, or when the restoration of a condition of usefulness of any public building which has been destroyed by accident appears advisable or in order to settle lawful claims for personal injuries or property damage where such municipality is liable therefor under law, exclusive of claims arising from the operation of any public utility owned by the municipality, or in order to meet mandatory expenditures required by law, the board of governing authorities may, upon adoption by unanimous vote of all members present, at any meeting, of a resolution stating the facts constituting the emergency and entering the same upon its minutes, make the expenditures, borrow money, or incur the liabilities necessary to meet such emergency, without further notice or hearing, and may revise the budget accordingly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, 9121-09; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 9, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-21.
Emergency warrants.

All emergency expenditures made under the provisions of Section 21-35-19 shall be made by the issuance of emergency warrants drawn against the special fund, or funds, properly chargeable with such expenditures. The municipal depository is authorized and directed to pay such emergency warrants with any money in such fund, or funds, available for such purpose. If at any time there shall not be sufficient money available in such fund, or funds, from usual sources or from grants, transfers or donations, to pay such warrants, then the governing authorities of the municipality are hereby authorized to borrow the required amount, not to exceed the authorized emergency expenditures, in the manner now provided by law, and shall execute the notes of the municipality for the amount borrowed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-10; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 10, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-22.
Municipal Reserve Fund.

Any municipality in the state may establish a special fund to be known as a municipal reserve fund. Funds specifically designated by the governing authorities of a municipality for deposit in the municipality’s reserve fund shall be deposited in a separate municipal account established for this purpose. The interest earned in a municipality’s reserve fund shall be credited to the municipality’s reserve fund. Legal expenditures shall be made from the fund upon requisition of the governing authorities of a municipality, spread on the minutes and signed by the mayor of the municipality, the secretary of the mayor, or the president of the city council or board of aldermen. A municipality may deposit funds as needed into its reserve fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 21-35-23.
When appropriations made under budget to lapse.

All appropriations, other than appropriations for uncompleted improvements in progress of construction, shall lapse at the end of the fiscal year. The appropriation accounts shall remain open for a period of thirty days thereafter for the payment of claims incurred against such appropriations prior to the close of the fiscal year and remaining unpaid. After such period shall have expired, all appropriations, except as hereinbefore provided regarding uncompleted improvements, shall become null and void, and any lawful claim presented thereafter against any such appropriation shall be provided for in the current budget.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-11; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 11, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-25.
Revision of municipal budget.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, the budget of any municipality may be revised as provided in this section and under the conditions herein stated, and when a deficit is indicated the budget shall be revised.

The governing authorities of any municipality are authorized to revise the budget for expenses of such municipality at any one (1) regular meeting of said governing authorities held not later than August of the first year in which such governing authorities enter upon the discharge of their duties, provided there be funds in the treasury of the municipality, or coming into the treasury during the fiscal year, not appropriated by the budget of the outgoing board of governing authorities, and there is a deficit in any one (1) or more items provided for in the budget of the preceding board. This section shall not, however, validate or invalidate any contracts made, executed or entered into by the governing authorities of the preceding term.

If it appears at any time during the current fiscal year, but not later than the regular July meeting of the board of governing authorities, that collections of anticipated revenues from taxes or other sources will be less than the amount estimated, and a deficit is thereby indicated for any fund, or funds, the governing authorities shall, at a regular meeting, revise and reduce the budget appropriations for such funds as is anticipated will have a deficit, so as to conform to the lowered indicated revenue, including revenue from taxes and all other sources.

If it affirmatively appears at any time during the current fiscal year that actual collections and anticipated revenues from taxes or other sources, including grants or donations, will exceed the estimates, then the governing authorities may revise and increase the budget appropriation of such fund, or funds, affected by such increase in revenue, but no such transfer shall be made from fund to fund, or from item to item, which will result in the expenditure of any money for a purpose different from that for which the tax was levied. The budget, as so revised, shall be spread in detail upon the minutes of said board of governing authorities. However, no such increase shall in any event be construed to authorize expenditures or to incur obligations which will result in a deficit in any fund, or funds.

If the increase in revenue over the estimates is from other than regular sources, including grants and donations, such excess over the estimate may be expended for improvements and new construction, including buildings, additions to buildings, streets, and street improvements.

If it affirmatively appears at any time during the current fiscal year that there is in any fund or account any sum remaining unexpended and not needed or expected to be needed for the purpose or purposes for which appropriated in said budget, then the governing authorities may, in their discretion, transfer such sum or any part thereof to any other fund or funds or account or accounts where needed, by order to such effect entered upon their minutes. This shall not, however, authorize the expenditure of any funds for any purpose other than that for which the levy producing such funds was made.

Any amendments made pursuant to this section to an originally adopted budget which exceed ten percent (10%) of the total amount appropriated or authorized to be expended in a particular department fund shall be published or posted within two (2) weeks of the action in a newspaper in the same manner as the final adopted budget. Separate amendments to an originally adopted budget during one fiscal year which affect a particular department fund shall be considered as one (1) amendment in determining whether the ten percent (10%) threshold requiring publication or posting has been reached. This publication or posted notice shall contain a description of the amendment, the amount of money and funds affected, and a detailed statement explaining the need and purpose of the amendment. The vote of each member of the municipality’s governing authority on each amendment shall be included in the publication or posted notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-14; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 14; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 21-35-27.
Expenditures for last year of term are limited.

No board of governing authorities of any municipality shall expend from, or contract an obligation, against the budget made and published by it during the last year of the term of office of such governing authorities, between the first day of April and the first day of the following July that is not on a weekend, a sum exceeding one-fourth (1/4) of any item of the budget made and published by it, except in cases of emergency provided for in Section 21-35-19. The city clerk of any municipality is hereby prohibited from issuing any warrant contrary to the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a contract, lease or lease-purchase contract entered into pursuant to Section 31-7-13 or to seasonal purchases or expenditures.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-15; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 15; Laws, 1984 ch. 480, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 428, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 597, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 558, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 319, § 6, eff July 22, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.).

§ 21-35-29.
Duties of state auditor.

The state auditor, as the head of the state department of audit, or the director thereof, appointed by him, as designated and defined in Title 7, Chapter 7 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any office or officers hereafter designated to replace or perform the duties imposed by said chapter, is hereby empowered, and it is made his duty, to make such rules, regulations and classifications, and prescribe such forms as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, to define what expenditures shall be chargeable to each budget account, and to establish such accounting and cost systems as may be necessary to provide accurate budget information.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-13; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 13, eff from and after August 31, 1950.

§ 21-35-31.
Annual audits or reports required; noncompliance; authority to withhold from allocations and payments payable to municipality certain amount to pay cost of audit or report.

[For municipal fiscal years commencing before October 1, 2009, this section shall read as follows:]

The governing authorities of every municipality in the state shall have their books audited annually, prior to the close of the next succeeding fiscal year, either by a competent accountant approved by the State Auditor or by a certified public accountant, who has paid a privilege tax as such in this state, and shall pay for same out of the General Fund. No advertisement shall be necessary before entering into such contract, but same shall be entered into as a private contract. Said audit shall be made upon a uniform formula set up and promulgated by the State Auditor, as the head of the State Department of Audit, or the director thereof, appointed by him, as designated and defined in Title 7, Chapter 7, of the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any office or officers hereafter designated to replace or perform the duties imposed by said chapter. Provided, however, any municipality with a population of three thousand (3,000) or less may employ a competent accountant or auditor, approved by the State Auditor, to prepare annually a compilation report and a compliance letter, in a format prescribed by the State Auditor, in lieu of an annual audit when such audit will be a financial hardship on the municipality. Two (2) copies of said audit or compilation shall be mailed to the said State Auditor within thirty (30) days after completion of said audit. Said State Auditor shall, at the end of each fiscal year, submit to the Legislature a composite report showing any information concerning municipalities in this state that he might deem pertinent and necessary to the Legislature for use in its deliberations. A synopsis of said audit, in a format prescribed by the State Auditor, shall be published within thirty (30) days by the governing authorities of such municipalities in a newspaper published in such municipalities or, if no newspaper be published in any such municipality, in any newspaper having a general circulation published in the county wherein such municipality is located. The publication of the audit may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19, Mississippi Code of 1972. Such publication shall be made one (1) time, and the governing authorities of such municipalities shall be authorized to pay only one-half (1/2) of the legal rate prescribed by law for such legal publication.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-17; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 17; Laws, 1970, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 6; Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 435, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 361, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 21-35-31.
Annual audits or reports required; noncompliance; authority to withhold from allocations and payments payable to municipality certain amount to pay cost of audit or report.

[For municipal fiscal years commencing on or after October 1, 2009, this section shall read as follows:]

The governing authority of every municipality in the state shall have the municipal books audited annually, before the close of the next succeeding fiscal year, in accordance with procedures and reporting requirements prescribed by the State Auditor. The municipality shall pay for the audit or report out of its general fund. No advertisement shall be necessary before entering into the contract, and it shall be entered into as a private contract. The audit or report shall be made upon a uniform formula set up and promulgated by the State Auditor, as the head of the State Department of Audit, or the director thereof, appointed by him, as designated and defined in Title 7, Chapter 7, Mississippi Code of 1972, or any office or officers hereafter designated to replace or perform the duties imposed by said chapter. Two (2) copies of the audit or report shall be mailed to the said State Auditor within thirty (30) days after completion. The State Auditor, at the end of each fiscal year, shall submit to the Legislature a composite report showing any information concerning municipalities in this state that the Auditor deems pertinent and necessary to the Legislature for use in its deliberations. A synopsis of the audit or report, in a format prescribed by the State Auditor, shall be published within thirty (30) days by the governing authority of each municipality in a newspaper published in the municipality or, if no newspaper is published in a municipality, in any newspaper having a general circulation published in the county wherein the municipality is located. The publication of the audit or report may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19. Publication shall be made one (1) time, and the governing authority of each municipality shall be authorized to pay only one-half (1/2) of the legal rate prescribed by law for such legal publication.

It shall be the duty of the State Auditor to determine whether each municipality has complied with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. If upon examination the State Auditor determines that a municipality has not initiated efforts to comply with the requirements of subsection (1), the State Auditor shall file a certified written notice with the clerk of the municipality notifying the governing authority of the municipality that a certificate of noncompliance will be issued to the State Tax Commission and to the Attorney General thirty (30) days immediately following the date of the filing of the notice unless within that period the municipality substantially complies with the requirements of subsection (1). If, after thirty (30) days from the giving of the notice, the municipality, in the opinion of the State Auditor, has not substantially initiated efforts to comply with the requirements of subsection (1), the State Auditor shall issue a certificate of noncompliance to the clerk of the municipality, State Tax Commission and the Attorney General. Thereafter, the State Tax Commission shall withhold from all allocations and payments to the municipality that would otherwise be payable the amount necessary to pay one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the cost of preparing the required audit or report as contracted for by the State Auditor. The cost shall be determined by the State Auditor after receiving proposals for the audit or report required in subsection (1) of this section. The State Auditor shall notify the State Tax Commission of the amount in writing, and the State Tax Commission shall transfer that amount to the State Auditor. The State Auditor is authorized to escalate, budget and expend these funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration consistent with the escalation of federal funds. All remaining funds shall be retained by the State Auditor to offset the costs of administering these contracts. The State Auditor shall not unreasonably delay the issuance of a written notice of cancellation of a certificate of noncompliance but shall promptly issue a written notice of cancellation of certificate of noncompliance upon an affirmative showing by the municipality that it has come into substantial compliance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-17; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 17; Laws, 1970, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 6; Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 435, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 361, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 21-35-33.
Penalty for violation.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided by law, which shall be in addition to any other penalty now or hereafter imposed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9121-18; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 18, eff from and after August 31, 1950.